test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_viezzad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - viežžâđ: # MLO, checked
    viežžâđ+V+Inf: viežžâđ
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viežâm
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viežah
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viäžžá
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: viežžeen
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: viežžâvettee
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: viežžâv
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viežžâp
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viežžâvetteđ
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: viežžih
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viežžim
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: viežžih
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viežâi
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: viežáim
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: viežáid
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: viežáin
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: viežâim
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viežâid
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viežžii
    viežžâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: viežâččim
    viežžâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: viežâččih
    viežžâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: viežâččij
    viežžâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: viežâččáim
    viežžâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: viežâččáid
    viežžâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: viežâččáin
    viežžâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: viežâččijm
    viežžâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: viežâččijd
    viežžâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: viežâččii
    viežžâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: viežžeem
    viežžâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: viežžeeh
    viežžâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: viežâš
    viežžâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: viežâžeen
    viežžâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: viežâšvettee
    viežžâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: viežâžává
    viežžâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: viežâžep
    viežžâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: viežâšvetteđ
    viežžâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: viežâžeh
    viežžâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: viežâ
    viežžâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: viäžus
    viežžâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: viäžžoon
    viežžâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: viežžee
    viežžâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: viäžžus
    viežžâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: viäžžup
    viežžâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: viežžâđ
    viežžâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: viäžžus
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: viežâ
    viežžâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: viežžâm
    viežžâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: viežâččii
    viežžâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: viežžii
    viežžâđ+V+PrsPrc: viežžee
    viežžâđ+V+PrfPrc: viežžâm
    viežžâđ+V+Actio+Nom: viežžâm
    viežžâđ+V+Actio+Ess: viežžâmin
    viežžâđ+V+Actio+Loc: viežžâmist
    viežžâđ+V+Actio+Ill: viežžâmân
    viežžâđ+V+Actio+Com: viežâdijn
    viežžâđ+V+VAbess: viežâhánnáá
